Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 7. Private Family Trust Companies

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-701.
Establishment of a private family trust company.

One (1) or more persons may subscribe to an organizational instrument in writing for the purpose of forming a private family trust company, subject to the provisions of this chapter.

The articles of incorporation for a private family trust company organized as a corporation shall include all of the information required by W.S.

17-16-202

and the following:

The corporate name, which shall comply with W.S.

13-5-302

and

17-16-401

;

A statement that the articles of incorporation are made to enable the corporation to act as a fiduciary for the family members; and

A statement that the corporation will act as a fiduciary exclusively for one (1) or more family members and will not engage in trust company business with the general public.

The articles of organization for a private family trust company organized as a limited liability company shall include all of the information required by W.S.

17-29-201

and the following:

The name of the limited liability company, which shall comply with W.S.

13-5-302

and

17-29-108

;

A statement that the articles of organization are made to enable the corporation to act as a fiduciary for the family members; and

A statement that the limited liability company will act as a fiduciary exclusively for one (1) or more family members and will not engage in trust company business with the general public.

Upon the approval of the organizational instrument of a private family trust company by the secretary of state, the directors or managers of the private family trust company shall execute and deliver a signed waiver to the commissioner acknowledging that the private family trust company is not supervised by the commissioner and that at all times the private family trust company will not transact trust company business with the general public.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-702.
Inspection of private family trust companies; authority of commissioner.

If the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that a private family trust company proposes to transact or has transacted trust company business with the general public, then the commissioner may conduct any inspections of the private family trust company as he deems necessary to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

If the commissioner discovers that a private family trust company has proposed to transact or has transacted trust company business with the general public, then the commissioner may take any action authorized under W.S.

13-10-201

through

13-10-209

with respect to the private family trust company to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-703.
Private family trust companies; applicability of chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of this chapter applicable to supervised trust companies and family trust companies shall not apply to private family trust companies.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.